New Jersey, session 221, A1378.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.   The Commissioner of Corrections, in consultation with the Police Training Commission, shall develop and implement an in-service training program for adult corrections officers appointed by the State who have satisfactorily completed the basic training course approved by the commission.  The program curriculum shall be developed by the commissioner based upon a needs assessment and in compliance with standards of the American Correctional Association.  The program shall be designed to accommodate the experience level of individual corrections officers. b.    Pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), the commissioner may promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the provisions of this act. 2.    A person appointed by the State as an adult corrections officer who has satisfactorily completed an in-service basic training course pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1988, c.176 (C.52:17B-68.1) shall satisfactorily complete the in-service training program developed by the commissioner pursuant to section 1 of P.L.    , c.       (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 3.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the sixth month after enactment; provided however, the commissioner may take, prior to the effective date, such anticipatory action as needed to effectuate its provisions.